Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Definitions; Policy
281.590.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this Commonwealth:

To provide for fair and impartial regulation of all transportation subject to the provisions of this chapter, so administered as to recognize and preserve the inherent advantages of each type of motor transportation; to promote safe, adequate, economical and efficient service;

To encourage the establishment and maintenance of reasonable charges for such transportation service, without unjust discriminations or undue preferences or advantages; and

To cooperate with the several states and the duly authorized officials thereof, all to the end of developing, coordinating and preserving a state transportation system by motor vehicles as defined in this chapter adequate to meet the needs of this Commonwealth. All of the provisions of this chapter shall be administered and enforced with the view to carry out the declaration of policy in this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 1; 2015 ch. 19, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

281.592.
Motor carrier transportation contracts — When against public policy and void and unenforceable.

As used in this section:

“Motor carrier transportation contract” means a contract, agreement, or understanding covering:

The transportation of property for compensation or hire by a motor carrier;

The entrance on property by a motor carrier for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting property for compensation or hire; or

A service incidental to activity described in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph, including but not limited to storage of property; and

“Promisee” means a person with whom a motor carrier enters into a motor carrier transportation contract and any agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors who are directly responsible to that person. “Promisee” does not include the motor carrier party to a motor carrier transportation contract with the promisee, and the motor carrier’s agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors directly responsible to the motor carrier.

A provision, clause, covenant, or agreement contained in, collateral to, or affecting a motor carrier transportation contract that purports to indemnify, defend, or hold the promisee harmless, or has the effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding the promisee harmless, or requires a motor carrier to procure liability insurance covering the acts or omissions or both of the promisee, from or against any liability for loss or damage resulting from the negligence or intentional acts or omissions of the promisee, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

This section shall not apply to the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement administered by the Intermodal Association of North America or other agreements providing for the interchange, use, or possession of intermodal chassis or other intermodal equipment.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.